Utah statutes.
26-18-404.   Home and community-based long-term care -- Room and board assistance.

If the department receives approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services within the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services to replace the Medicaid program's current FlexCare program with a new program to provide long-term care services in home and community-based settings rather than institutions, the department shall assist in the payment of room and board costs for any person in the new program without sufficient income to fully pay those costs.



Enacted by Chapter 190, 2007 General Session

